Wyoming, session 2025, SF0044.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-25-301 is created to read:
ARTICLE 3
PARTICIPATION IN INTERCOLLEGIATE ATHLETICS
21-25-301. Intercollegiate athletic competitions
based on biological sex.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Athletic competition" means any
intercollegiate athletic display between teams or persons,
including a contest, exhibition, performance or sport;
(ii) "Educational institution" means the
University of Wyoming and each Wyoming community college;
(iii) "Female" means a person who has, had, will
have or would have had, but for a congenital anomaly or
intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports and utilizes
eggs for fertilization;
(iv) "Individual sport" means an athletic
activity where participants compete as individuals for a
time, score or result, regardless of whether their
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 94, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
individual time, score or result contributes to an overall
team score;
(v) "Male" means a person who has, had, will
have or would have had, but for a congenital anomaly or
intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports and utilizes
sperm for fertilization.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, no educational institution shall allow:
(i) A student to compete in an athletic
competition sponsored or authorized by the educational
institution that is designated for the sex opposite to the
student's sex;
(ii) A male student to compete in an athletic
competition that is mixed-sex in a position that is
designated by rule or procedure for female students;
(iii) Participation in any athletic competition
designated for students of the female sex with or against a
team that the educational institution knows has on the team
a student of the male sex;
(iv) Except as provided by subsection (c) of
this section, in the case of an individual sport, students
of the female sex to directly compete against a student
that the educational institution knows is a student of the
male sex if the educational institution determines that the
competition would be unsafe or unfair to the students of
the female sex.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 94, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) An educational institution may allow a female
student to compete in an athletic competition that is
designated for male students if a corresponding athletic
competition designated for female students is not offered
or available.
(d) For purposes of this section, a statement of a
student's sex on the student's official birth certificate
is considered to have correctly stated the student's sex
only if the statement was entered at or near the time of
the student's birth or modified to correct a clerical error
in the student's sex.
(e) No educational institution shall retaliate
against a person for reporting a violation of this section.
An educational institution may discipline a student or
employee of the institution for making a false report of a
violation of this section.
(f) A person shall have a private civil cause of
action against an educational institution for any violation
of this section. An action filed pursuant to this section
shall be subject to W.S. 1-39-113 and 1-39-114. The
liability of an educational institution for any violation
of this section shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars
($50,000.00).
(g) A person may seek declaratory and injunctive
relief against an educational institution for any violation
of this section. The court may order injunctive or other
equitable relief. The court may award the prevailing party
reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(h) The University of Wyoming and the Wyoming
community college commission shall promulgate rules to
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0044
ENROLLED ACT NO. 94, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
implement this section. Rules adopted under this subsection
shall ensure compliance with state and federal law
regarding the confidentiality of student medical
information.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4